Utah statutes.
63G-6-403.   Procurement -- Use of recycled goods.

The procurement officer or other person responsible for purchasing supplies for each public procurement unit shall:

(1)  comply with Section 63G-6-406; and

(2) (a)  maintain for reference a copy of the current listing of recycled items available on state contract as issued by the chief procurement officer under Section 63G-6-204; and

(b)  give recycled items consideration when inviting bids and purchasing supplies.

